src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection
Livvi nouns inflect in cases.
Vowel harmony involves front and back
Gradation does not affect all consonants, therefore
there are three values: Yes, No and NA (not applicable)


## The file proper



### ONE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS ENDING IN LONG VOWEL SEGMENT
LEXICON N_SUO suo:suo
Gradation: No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_VYÖ vyö:vyö
Gradation: No
Harmony: Front

LEXICON N_KUU kuu:kuu
Gradation: No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_PII pii:pii
Gradation: No
Harmony: front

LEXICON N_MUA mua:mua
Gradation: No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_PIÄ piä:piä
Gradation: No
Harmony: Front

### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS

LEXICON N_PAPPI pappi:pappi
Gradation: Yes
Harmony: Back
stem final i is retained

LEXICON N_HÄKKI häkki:häkki
Gradation: Yes
Harmony: Front
stem final i is retained

LEXICON N_LEIRI leiri:leiri
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front
stem	final i is retained

LEXICON N_PADA pada:pada
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back
stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem


LEXICON N_KALA kala:kala
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
stem final a changes to o before i in Pl stem

LEXICON N_OZA oza:oza
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
stem final a changes to u in Sg Par
stem final a changes to 0 before i in Pl stem



LEXICON N_SÄYNÄ säynä:säynä
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front
stem final ä changes to i in Sg Par
stem final ä changes to 0 before i in Pl stem







LEXICON N_KOIVU koivu:koivu
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
There are no changes in stem-final **u**
Plural stem in **loi**



LEXICON N_HERY hery:hery
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front
There are no	changes	in stem-final **y**
Plural stem in **löi**



LEXICON N_IDY idy:idy
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front
There are no changes in stem-final **y**
Plural stem in **löi**



LEXICON N_LUGU lugu:lugu
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back
There are no changes in stem-final **u**
Plural stem in **loi**



LEXICON N_RUNO runo:runo
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
Stem-fianl o changes to u in Sg Par
Plural stem in **loi**


LEXICON N_HÖRÖ hörö:hörö
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_RUADO ruado:ruado
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_KYNDÖ kyndö:kyndö
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front


### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM WITH UNIQUE +Nom+Sg VOWEL

LEXICON N_JÄLGI jälgi:jälg
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_JOGI jogi:jog
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_MUAMO muamo:muama
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_TUATTO tuatto:tuatta
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_DIÄDÖ diädö:diädä
Gradation No
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_MUARJU muarju:muarja
Gradation No
Harmony: Back
two forms for accusative
two forms for elative, ablative phrases

*Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - muarju examples:*
* *muarju:* `muarju+N+Sg+Nom`
* *muarjan:* `muarju+N+Sg+Gen`
* *muarjua:* `muarju+N+Sg+Par`
* *muarjakse:* `muarju+N+Sg+Tra`
* *muarjata:* `muarju+N+Sg+Abe`
* *muarjanke:* `muarju+N+Sg+Com`
* *muarjas:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ine`
* *muarjaspäi:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ela`
* *muarjah:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ill`
* *muarjal:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ade`
* *muarjalpäi:* `muarju+N+Sg+Abl`
* *muarjale:* `muarju+N+Sg+All`
* *muarjannu:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ess`
* *muarjassah:* `muarju+N+Sg+Ter`
* *muarjalluo:* `muarju+N+Sg+Apr`
* *muarjat:* `muarju+N+Pl+Nom`
* *muarjoin:* `muarju+N+Pl+Gen`
* *muarjoi:* `muarju+N+Pl+Par`
* *muarjoikse:* `muarju+N+Pl+Tra`
* *muarjoita:* `muarju+N+Pl+Abe`
* *muarjoinke:* `muarju+N+Pl+Com`
* *muarjois:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ine`
* *muarjoispäi:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ela`
* *muarjoih:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ill`
* *muarjoil:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ade`
* *muarjoilpäi:* `muarju+N+Pl+Abl`
* *muarjoile:* `muarju+N+Pl+All`
* *muarjoinnu:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ess`
* *muarjoin:* `muarju+N+Pl+Ins`
* *muarjoilluo:* `muarju+N+Pl+Apr`


LEXICON N_PIÄSTÄNDY piäständy:piäständä
Gradation No
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_SUAJU suaju:suaja
Gradation No
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_AKKU akku:akka
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_KNIIGU kniigu:kniiga
Gradation No
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_SULGU sulgu:sulga
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back





LEXICON N_KOIRU koiru:koira
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_NIMI nimi:nim
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_HANGI hangi:hang
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_PÄIVY päivy:päivä
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_MEČČY meččy:meččä
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_IŽÄNDY ižändy:ižändä
Gradation No
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_LATE late:latte
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_SIVE sive:side
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_HARDIE hardie:hardie
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_KONDII kondii:kondi
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_STIPENDII stipendii:stipendi
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_REBOI reboi:reboi
Gradation No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_JÄNÖI jänöi:jänöi
Gradation No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_PÖČÖI pöčöi:pöččö
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front

LEXICON N_VALGEI valgei:valge
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_LIBEI libei:libe
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_OSTAI ostai:osta
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_PEZII pezii:pezi
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front




LEXICON N_KESTÄY kestäy:kestä
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS WITH CONSONANT-FINAL PARTITIVE STEM
LEXICON N_UKSI uksi:uks
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_SUARI suari:suar
Harmony: Back
LEXICON N_SUARI-PL suari:suar
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI_01 kieli:kiel
Gradation No


LEXICON N_KIELI kieli:kiel
Harmony: Front

LEXICON N_KIELI-SG kieli:kiel
LEXICON N_KIELI-PL kieli:kiel
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_LAPSI lapsi:laps lapsi:laps
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_VEZI vezi:ved
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_SUZI suzi:su
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_VUOZI vuozi:vuod
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back


### THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON N_SYGYZY sygyzy:sygyzy
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_VASKIČČU vaskičču:vaskičča
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back



### THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
LEXICON N_KARJAL karjal:karjal
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
LEXICON N_KARJAL-SG karjal:karjal
LEXICON N_KARJAL-PL karjal:karjal

LEXICON N_MADAL madal:madal
Gradation No
Harmony: Back
LEXICON N_MADAL-SG madal:madal
LEXICON N_MADAL-PL madal:madal

LEXICON N_PIIRAI piirai:piira CHECK THIS
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_VERÄI veräi:verä CHECK THIS
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back




LEXICON N_KANDAI kandai:kanda
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_AVUAJU 
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_KERIÄJY piästäjy:piästä
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_PAGIZII pagizii:pagizi
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-SG 
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-PL 

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI huoletoi: huolet
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back




LEXICON N_SAMMAL sammal:sammal
Gradation No
Harmony: Back






LEXICON N_ŠOUFER šoufer:šoufer
Vowel Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_VANUIN vanuin:vanui
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back
Stem	     consonant n/m
Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
Plural stem vowel i



LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN sammutin:sammutti
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back
Stem consonant n/m
Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
Plural stem vowel i



LEXICON N_KEITIN keitin:keitti
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front
Stem consonant n/m
Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
Plural stem vowel i



LEXICON N_LÄMMIN lämmin:lämbi
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_TAIGIN taigin:taigin
Gradation No
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_KARJALAINE karjalaine:karjala
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE liygiläine:liygilä
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_NAINE naine:nai
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_KIELINE kieline:kieli
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_TOINE toine:to
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back





LEXICON N_RAIŠ raiš:ra
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_TOVESTEH tovesteh:tovesteh
Gradation No
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_PEREH pereh:pereh
Gradation No
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_HUIKEH huikeh:huikkeh
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_LIIKEH liikeh:liikkeh
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_PENGER penger:penger
Gradation No
Harmony: Front


LEXICON N_ARTELI arteli:arteli
Gradation No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS puhtahus:puhtahu
Harmony: Back
Gradation NA

LEXICON N_VÄHYS vähys:vähy
Harmony: Back
Gradation NA



LEXICON N_ALUS alus:aluks
Gradation No
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_ALUS-SG alus:aluks

LEXICON N_ALUS-PL alus:aluks

LEXICON N_ILVES ilves:ilveks
Gradation No
Harmony: Front

LEXICON N_ILVES-SG ilves:ilveks

LEXICON N_ILVES-PL ilves:ilveks

LEXICON N_MIES mies:mie
Gradation No
Harmony: Front

LEXICON N_MIES-SG mies:mie

LEXICON N_MIES-PL mies:mie

LEXICON N_KUURNIS kuurnis:kuurne
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ suališ:suali
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-SG suališ:suali

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-PL suališ:suali

LEXICON N_OLUT olut:olu
Gradation No
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_KEVÄT kevät:kevä
Gradation No
Harmony: Front



LEXICON N_TUHAT tuhat:tuha
Gradation No
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_ARMAS armas:arma
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_VARVAS varvas:varba
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_PAREMBI parembi:paremb
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back


LEXICON N_PESSYH pessyh:pessy
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front




LEXICON N_BEMMEL bemmel:bembel
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Front




LEXICON N_SUURIM suurim:suurim
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back



LEXICON N_TUATINDAM tuatindam:tuatindam
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back




LEXICON N_TUATANDIM tuatandim:tuatandim
Gradation NA
Harmony: Back






LEXICON N_SIEMEN siemen:siemen
Gradation NA
Harmony: Front







LEXICON N_SALBOIN salboin:salboi
Gradation No
Harmony: Back







LEXICON N_UDAR udar:udar
Gradation No
Harmony: Back




LEXICON N_PIENAR pienar:piendar
Gradation Yes
Harmony: Back






### NOMINAL DECLENSION BEGINS



Back vowel
gradation Yes





LEXICON NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY muarju:muarja
gradation NA




LEXICON NMN_AKKU akku:akka
gradation Yes


LEXICON NMN_KNIIGU kniigu:kniiga
gradation No











### NMN = Nominals mutually shared case marking for nouns, adjectives, proper ouns, numerals



Front Vowel
Gradation Yes













LEXICON NMN_YKSI yksi:y








LEXICON NMN_VUOZI/VEZI vuozi:vuod




LEXICON NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI parembi:paremb

*Adjective comparative examples:*
* *tuorehembi:* `tuores+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* ★*tuorehembembannu:* `tuores+A+Comp+Comp+Sg+Ess` (is not standard language)



LEXICON NMN_KUDAI kudai:kuda




LEXICON NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI piirai:piira





LEXICON NMN_PAGIZII-SG 

LEXICON NMN_PAGIZII-PL 


LEXICON NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI huoletoi: huolet


Gradation Yes
Vowel Harmony Back



LEXICON NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY koiru:koira
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Back



LEXICON NMN_AVUAJU/KERIÄJY päivy:päivä
Gradation NA




gradation Yes







LEXICON NMN_KOIVU/HERY koivu:koivu
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Back



LEXICON NMN_LUGU/IDY lugu:lugu
Gradation Yes
Vowel Harmony Back










* **LEXICON NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI** valgei:valge


LEXICON NMN_RAHMANNOI rahmannoi:rahmannoi


LEXICON NMN_HARDIE hardie:hardie


LEXICON NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII kondii:kondi





LEXICON NMN_OSTAI ostua:osta%>j



Stem Vowel 0:a:0 kandai, kandajan, kandajua, kandajinnu


LEXICON NMN_PEZII pestä:pezi%>j




LEXICON NMN_KESTÄY kestäy:kestä



LEXICON NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ runo:runo
Gradation No


Gradation No


LEXICON NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ruado:ruado
Gradation Yes





LEXICON NMN_KUU/PII kuu:kuu



LEXICON NMN_PIÄ piä:piä




LEXICON NMN_VYÖ vyö:vyö




LEXICON NMN_MUA mua:mua



LEXICON NMN_KALA kala:kala
Gradation NA


LEXICON NMN_PADA pada:pada
Yaml: **pada**
Gradation Yes


LEXICON NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH pessyh

### Nominative singular in "h"

* :zi PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; the +Pl+Com comes here

LEXICON NMN_TULLUH tulluh:tullu

### Nominative singular in "h"

* :zi PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_EN ; the +Pl+Com comes here

LEXICON NMN_KARJAL karjal:karjal

LEXICON NMN_KARJAL-SG karjal:karjal
LEXICON NMN_KARJAL-PL karjal:karjal

LEXICON NMN_MADAL madal:madal

LEXICON NMN_MADAL-SG madal:madal
LEXICON NMN_MADAL-PL madal:madal

###  Nominative singular in "m"













###  Nominative singular in "n"
